Louisiana, session 2026, HB394.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4.1(D)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§574.4.1. Parole consideration and hearings
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) If the committee on parole determines that it is necessary for the prisoner
to complete one or more rehabilitative programs prior to his release to ensure public
safety and enhance the prisoner's opportunity for success, the release date of the
prisoner may be extended to no later than nine twenty-four months after the parole
hearing or the most recent reconsideration of the prisoner's case.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.